Missouri, session 2026, HB2828.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 195.017, 579.015, and 579.020, RSMo, are repealed and three
2 new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 195.017, 579.015, and 579.020,
3 to read as follows:
195.017. 1. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in
2 Schedule I if it finds that the substance:
3 (1) Has high potential for abuse; and
4 (2) Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or lacks accepted
5 safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.
6 2. Schedule I:
7 (1) The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule I;
8 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
9 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
10 these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:
11 (a) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-
12 phenylacetamide);
13 (b) Acetylmethadol;
14 (c) Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);
15 (d) Acryl fentanyl (-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide);
16 (e) AH-7921(3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino) cyclohexylmethyl] benzamide);
17 (f) Allylprodine;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2828 2
18 (g) Alphacetylmethadol (except levoalphacetylmethadol, also known as levo-alpha-
19 acetylmethadol levothadyl acetate or LAAM);
20 (h) Alphameprodine;
21 (i) Alphamethadol;
22 (j) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-1-(alphamethyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl)
23 propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4 ((N-propanilido) piperidine);
24 (k) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-(1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-
25 phenylpropanamide);
26 (l) Benzethidine;
27 (m) Betacetylmethadol;
28 (n) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-
29 phenylpropanamide);
30 (o) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-
31 piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
32 (p) Betameprodine;
33 (q) Betamethadol;
34 (r) Betaprodine;
35 (s) Clonitazene;
36 (t) Dextromoramide;
37 (u) Diampromide;
38 (v) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;
39 (w) Diethylthiambutene;
40 (x) Difenoxin;
41 (y) Dimenoxadol;
42 (z) Dimepheptanol;
43 (aa) Dimethylthiambutene;
44 (bb) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
45 (cc) Dipipanone;
46 (dd) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
47 (ee) Etonitazene;
48 (ff) Etoxeridine;
49 (gg) 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl -(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
50 isobutyramide;
51 (hh) Furanyl fentanyl -(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide;
52 (ii) Furethidine;
53 (jj) Hydroxypethidine;
54 (kk) Ketobemidone;

HCS HB 2828 3
55 (ll) Levomoramide;
56 (mm) Levophenacylmorphan;
57 (nn) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-(3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl)-N-
58 phenylproanamide), its optical and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
59 (oo) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-((3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-
60 phenylpropanamide);
61 (pp) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
62 phenylacetamide);
63 (qq) Morpheridine;
64 (rr) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
65 (ss) MT-45(1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl) piperazine);
66 (tt) Noracymethadol;
67 (uu) Norlevorphanol;
68 (vv) Normethadone;
69 (ww) Norpipanone;
70 (xx) Ocfentanil N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
71 acetamide;
72 (yy) Ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-2-(1-phenethylpiperidin-yl)propionamide); other name
73 2-fluorofentanyl;
74 (zz) para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)
75 butyramide;
76 (aaa) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)
77 propanamide);
78 (bbb) PEPAP (1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
79 (ccc) Phenadoxone;
80 (ddd) Phenampromide;
81 (eee) Phenomorphan;
82 (fff) Phenoperidine;
83 (ggg) Piritramide;
84 (hhh) Proheptazine;
85 (iii) Properidine;
86 (jjj) Propiram;
87 (kkk) Racemoramide;
88 (lll) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
89 phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide);
90 (mmm) Thiofentanyl (-phenyl-N-(1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-propanamide);
91 (nnn) Tilidine;

HCS HB 2828 4
92 (ooo) Trimeperidine;
93 (3) Any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers
94 unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of
95 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
96 (a) Acetorphine;
97 (b) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
98 (c) Benzylmorphine;
99 (d) Codeine methylbromide;
100 (e) Codeine-N-Oxide;
101 (f) Cyprenorphine;
102 (g) Desomorphine;
103 (h) Dihydromorphine;
104 (i) Drotebanol;
105 (j) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
106 (k) Heroin;
107 (l) Hydromorphinol;
108 (m) Methyldesorphine;
109 (n) Methyldihydromorphine;
110 (o) Morphine methylbromide;
111 (p) Morphine methylsulfonate;
112 (q) Morphine-N-Oxide;
113 (r) Myrophine;
114 (s) Nicocodeine;
115 (t) Nicomorphine;
116 (u) Normorphine;
117 (v) Pholcodine;
118 (w) Thebacon;
119 (4) Any of the following opiate similar synthetic substances scheduled by the U.S.
120 Drug Enforcement Administration as substances that share a pharmacological profile similar
121 to fentanyl, morphine, and other synthetic opioids, unless specifically excepted or unless
122 listed in another schedule:
123 (a) Butyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide);
124 (b) U-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino) cyclohexyl]–methyl benzamide).
125 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of
126 the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless
127 specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
128 possible within the specific chemical designation:

HCS HB 2828 5
129 (a) Alpha-ethyltryptamine;
130 (b) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
131 (c) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
132 (d) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
133 (e) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine;
134 (f) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine;
135 (g) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl) ethanamine;
136 (h) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl) ethanamine;
137 (i) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl) ethanamine;
138 (j) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl) ethanamine;
139 (k) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
140 (l) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
141 (m) 2-(4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
142 (n) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
143 (o) 2-(4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
144 (p) 4-methoxyamphetamine;
145 (q) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
146 (r) 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
147 (s) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
148 (t) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;
149 (u) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine;
150 (v) N-hydroxy-3, 4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
151 (w) 3,4,5-trimethoxyamphetamine;
152 (x) 5-MeO-DMT or 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine;
153 (y) Alpha-methyltryptamine;
154 (z) Bufotenine;
155 (aa) Diethyltryptamine;
156 (bb) Dimethyltryptamine;
157 (cc) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine;
158 (dd) Ibogaine;
159 (ee) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
160 (ff) Marijuana or marihuana, except industrial hemp;
161 (gg) Mescaline;
162 (hh) Parahexyl;
163 (ii) Peyote, to include all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as
164 Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; any extract from

HCS HB 2828 6
165 any part of such plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or
166 preparation of the plant, its seed or extracts;
167 (jj) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
168 (kk) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
169 (ll) Psilocybin;
170 (mm) Psilocyn;
171 (nn) Tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis
172 (cannabis plant), except industrial hemp, as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances
173 contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of such plant, or synthetic
174 substances, derivatives and their isomers, or both, with similar chemical structure and
175 pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant, such as the following:
176 a. 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers;
177 b. 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers;
178 c. 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their optical isomers;
179 d. Any compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic
180 positions covered;
181 (oo) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine;
182 (pp) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine;
183 (qq) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine;
184 (rr) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine;
185 (ss) Salvia divinorum;
186 (tt) Salvinorin A;
187 (uu) Synthetic cannabinoids:
188 a. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 1H-indol-3-yl-
189 (1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,
190 haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-
191 (4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent,
192 whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to:
193 (i) AM2201, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
194 (ii) JWH-007, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
195 (iii) JWH-015, or 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
196 (iv) JWH-018, or 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
197 (v) JWH-019, or 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
198 (vi) JWH-073, or 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
199 (vii) JWH-081, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole;
200 (viii) JWH-098, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole;
201 (ix) JWH-122, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole;

HCS HB 2828 7
202 (x) JWH-164, or 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole;
203 (xi) JWH-200, or 1-(2-(4-(morpholinyl)ethyl))-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
204 (xii) JWH-210, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole;
205 (xiii) JWH-398, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole;
206 b. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at
207 the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
208 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
209 or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the
210 naphthyl ring to any extent;
211 c. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by
212 substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
213 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)
214 ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not
215 substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent;
216 d. Any compound structurally derived from 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at
217 the nitrogen atom of the indole ring with alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
218 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
219 or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the
220 phenyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to:
221 (i) JWH-201, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
222 (ii) JWH-203, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole;
223 (iii) JWH-250, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
224 (iv) JWH-251, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole;
225 (v) RCS-8, or 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
226 e. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by
227 substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
228 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)
229 ethyl group, whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Including, but
230 not limited to CP 47, 497 and homologues, or 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-
231 methyloctan-2-yl)phenol, where side chain n=5, and homologues where side chain n-4,6, or
232 7;
233 f. Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with substitution at the
234 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
235 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
236 whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
237 substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Including, but not limited to:
238 (i) AM-694, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole;

HCS HB 2828 8
239 (ii) RCS-4, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (SR-19 and RCS-4);
240 g. CP 50,556-1, or [(6S,6aR,9R,10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-methyl-3-[(2R)-5-phenylpentan-
241 2-yl] oxy-5,6,6a,7,8,9,10,10a-octahydrophenanthridin-1-yl] acetate;
242 h. HU-210, or (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-
243 6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
244 i. HU-211, or Dexanabinol,(6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-
245 methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
246 j. Dimethylheptylpyran, or DMHP;
247 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
248 following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their
249 salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of
250 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
251 (a) 1,4-Butanediol (BDO);
252 (b) Gamma-butyrolactone (GBL);
253 (c) Gamma hydroxybutyrate (GHB);
254 (d) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid;
255 [(b)] (e) Mecloqualone;
256 [(c)] (f) Methaqualone;
257 (7) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
258 following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their
259 salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
260 (a) Aminorex;
261 (b) N-benzylpiperazine;
262 (c) Cathinone;
263 (d) Fenethylline;
264 (e) 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
265 (f) 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
266 (g) Mephedrone, or 4-methylmethcathinone;
267 (h) Methcathinone;
268 (i) 4-methoxymethcathinone;
269 (j) (+,-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+,-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-
270 oxazolamine);
271 (k) Methylenedioxypyrovalerone, MDPV, or 1-(1,3-Benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(1-
272 pyrrolidinyl)-1-pentanone;
273 (l) Methylone, or 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone;
274 (m) 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, or MPBP;
275 (n) N-ethylamphetamine;

HCS HB 2828 9
276 (o) N,N-dimethylamphetamine;
277 (p) Quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-22; QUPIC);
278 (q) Quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (5-fluoro-PB-22; 5F-
279 PB-22);
280 (r) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
281 carboxamide (AB-FUBINACA);
282 (s) N-(1-amino-3, 3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide
283 (ADB-PINACA);
284 (8) A temporary listing of substances subject to emergency scheduling under federal
285 law shall include any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any
286 quantity of the following substances:
287 (a) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, its optical,
288 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
289 (b) [1-(5-fluoro-pentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone,
290 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
291 (c) N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and
292 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
293 (d) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical,
294 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
295 (e) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical,
296 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
297 (f) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical,
298 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
299 (g) 4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts,
300 and salts of isomers;
301 (h) 4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
302 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
303 (i) Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
304 salts, and salts of isomers;
305 (j) Butylone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
306 (k) Pentedrone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
307 isomers;
308 (l) Pentylone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
309 isomers;
310 (m) Naphyrone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
311 isomers;

HCS HB 2828 10
312 (n) Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
313 salts, and salts of isomers;
314 (o) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-
315 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
316 (p) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its
317 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
318 (q) [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-yl](naphthalen-1-yl)methanone, its optical,
319 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
320 (r) N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl) ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide,
321 its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
322 (s) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide, its optical, positional, and
323 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
324 (t) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-
325 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
326 (u) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
327 dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
328 (v) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its
329 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
330 (w) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
331 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
332 (x) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
333 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
334 (y) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
335 dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
336 (z) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-
337 dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
338 (aa) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide, its isomers,
339 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
340 (bb) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate,
341 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
342 (cc) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide, its isomers,
343 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
344 (dd) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
345 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
346 (ee) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide, its isomers, esters,
347 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;

HCS HB 2828 11
348 (ff) N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide, its isomers,
349 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
350 (gg) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide, its isomers,
351 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
352 (hh) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide, its isomers, esters,
353 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
354 (ii) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide, its isomers,
355 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
356 (jj) Fentanyl-related substances, their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of
357 isomers, esters, and ethers. Fentanyl-related substance shall mean any substance not
358 otherwise listed under another Drug Enforcement Administration Controlled Substance Code
359 Number, and for which no exemption or approval is in effect under section 505 of the Federal
360 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 355, that is structurally related to fentanyl
361 by one or more of the following modifications:
362 a. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any monocycle,
363 whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle;
364 b. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl,
365 halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups;
366 c. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether,
367 hydroxyl, amino or nitro groups;
368 d. Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle, whether or not
369 further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; or
370 e. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group;
371 (kk) Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate, its optical,
372 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (NM2201; CBL2201);
373 (ll) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
374 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (5F-
375 AB-PINACA);
376 (mm) 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its
377 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (4-CN-CUMYL-
378 BUTINACA; 4-cyano-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-CN-CUMYLBINACA; CUMYL-4CN-
379 BINACA; SGT-78);
380 (nn) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate,
381 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (MMB-CHMICA,
382 AMB-CHMICA);

HCS HB 2828 12
383 (oo) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-
384 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (5F-
385 CUMYL-P7AICA);
386 (pp) N-ethylpentylone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
387 of isomers (ephylone, 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one);
388 (qq) ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate,
389 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial name: 5F-
390 EDMB-PINACA);
391 (rr) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate,
392 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial name: 5F-
393 MDMB-PICA);
394 (ss) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
395 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial names: FUB-AKB48;
396 FUB-APINACA; AKB48 N-(4-FLUOROBENZYL));
397 (tt) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its
398 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial names: 5F-
399 CUMYL-PINACA; SGT-25);
400 (uu) (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl) methanone,
401 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial name: FUB-
402 144);
403 (vv) N-ethylhexedrone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
404 of isomers (Other name: 2-(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one);
405 (ww) alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
406 salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: α-PHP; alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone; 1-phenyl-2-
407 (pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);
408 (xx) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
409 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; (Other names: 4-MEAP; 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-
410 methylphenyl)pentan-1-one);
411 (yy) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
412 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: MPHP; 4'-methyl-alpha-
413 pyrrolidinohexanophenone; 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);
414 (zz) alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
415 salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: PV8; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one);
416 (aaa) 4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone, its optical, positional, and geometric
417 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other names: 4-chloro-α-PVP; 4'-chloro-alpha-
418 pyrrolidinopentiophenone; 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one);

HCS HB 2828 13
419 (9) Khat, to include all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as catha
420 edulis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; any extract from any part of such plant; and
421 every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seed or
422 extracts.
423 3. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule II
424 if it finds that:
425 (1) The substance has high potential for abuse;
426 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
427 States, or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and
428 (3) The abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence.
429 4. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule II:
430 (1) Any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by
431 extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical
432 synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
433 (a) Opium and opiate; and any salt, compound, derivative or preparation of opium or
434 opiate, excluding apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine,
435 nalmefene, naloxegol, naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including the
436 following:
437 a. Raw opium;
438 b. Opium extracts;
439 c. Opium fluid;
440 d. Powdered opium;
441 e. Granulated opium;
442 f. Tincture of opium;
443 g. Codeine;
444 h. Dihydroetorphine;
445 i. Ethylmorphine;
446 j. Etorphine hydrochloride;
447 k. Hydrocodone;
448 l. Hydromorphone;
449 m. Metopon;
450 n. Morphine;
451 o. Oripavine;
452 p. Oxycodone;
453 q. Oxymorphone;
454 r. Thebaine;

HCS HB 2828 14
455 (b) Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically
456 equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in this subdivision, but not
457 including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
458 (c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
459 (d) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and
460 any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or
461 identical with any of these substances, but not including the following:
462 a. Decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves, which extractions do not
463 contain cocaine or ecgonine; or
464 b. Ioflupane;
465 (e) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid,
466 solid or powder form which contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy);
467 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
468 salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
469 within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene excepted:
470 (a) Alfentanil;
471 (b) Alphaprodine;
472 (c) Anileridine;
473 (d) Bezitramide;
474 (e) Bulk dextropropoxyphene;
475 (f) Carfentanil;
476 (g) Dihydrocodeine;
477 (h) Diphenoxylate;
478 (i) Fentanyl;
479 (j) Isomethadone;
480 (k) Levo-alphacetylmethadol;
481 (l) Levomethorphan;
482 (m) Levorphanol;
483 (n) Metazocine;
484 (o) Methadone;
485 (p) Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenylbutane;
486 (q) Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenylpropane-
487 carboxylic acid;
488 (r) Pethidine (meperidine);
489 (s) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;
490 (t) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;
491 (u) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperdine-4-carboxylic acid;

HCS HB 2828 15
492 (v) Phenazocine;
493 (w) Piminodine;
494 (x) Racemethorphan;
495 (y) Racemorphan;
496 (z) Remifentanil;
497 (aa) Sufentanil;
498 (bb) Tapentadol;
499 (cc) Thiafentanil;
500 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
501 the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:
502 (a) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;
503 (b) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
504 (c) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
505 (d) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
506 (e) Methylphenidate;
507 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
508 the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including
509 its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts
510 of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
511 (a) Amobarbital;
512 (b) Glutethimide;
513 (c) Pentobarbital;
514 (d) Phencyclidine;
515 (e) Secobarbital;
516 (5) Hallucinogenic substances:
517 (a) Any material or compound which contains any quantity of nabilone;
518 (b) Dronabinol [(-)-Δ-9-trans tetrahydrocannabinol] in an oral solution in a drug
519 product approved for marketing by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;
520 (6) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
521 the following substances:
522 (a) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine: Phenylacetone;
523 (b) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
524 a. 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;
525 b. 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC);
526 (c) Immediate precursor to fentanyl: 4-anilino-N-phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP);
527 (7) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
528 the following alkyl nitrites:

HCS HB 2828 16
529 (a) Amyl nitrite;
530 (b) Butyl nitrite.
531 5. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule III
532 if it finds that:
533 (1) The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in
534 Schedules I and II;
535 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
536 States; and
537 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high
538 psychological dependence.
539 6. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule III:
540 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
541 the following substances having a potential for abuse associated with a stimulant effect on the
542 central nervous system:
543 (a) Benzphetamine;
544 (b) Chlorphentermine;
545 (c) Clortermine;
546 (d) Phendimetrazine;
547 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity or
548 salt of the following substances or salts having a depressant effect on the central nervous
549 system:
550 (a) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity or
551 salt of the following substances combined with one or more active medicinal ingredients:
552 a. Amobarbital;
553 b. Secobarbital;
554 c. Pentobarbital;
555 (b) Any suppository dosage form containing any quantity or salt of the following:
556 a. Amobarbital;
557 b. Secobarbital;
558 c. Pentobarbital;
559 (c) Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or its
560 salt;
561 (d) Chlorhexadol;
562 (e) Embutramide;
563 (f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers contained
564 in a drug product for which an application has been approved under Section 505 of the federal
565 Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

HCS HB 2828 17
566 (g) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
567 (h) Lysergic acid;
568 (i) Lysergic acid amide;
569 (j) Methyprylon;
570 (k) Perampanel, and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
571 (l) Sulfondiethylmethane;
572 (m) Sulfonethylmethane;
573 (n) Sulfonmethane;
574 (o) Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof;
575 (3) Nalorphine;
576 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of
577 any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts:
578 (a) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred milliliters or not more than
579 ninety milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline
580 alkaloid of opium;
581 (b) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred milliliters or not more than
582 ninety milligrams per dosage unit with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in
583 recognized therapeutic amounts;
584 (c) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per one hundred milliliters or not
585 more than ninety milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients
586 in recognized therapeutic amounts;
587 (d) Not more than three hundred milligrams of ethylmorphine per one hundred
588 milliliters or not more than fifteen milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active,
589 nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
590 (e) Not more than five hundred milligrams of opium per one hundred milliliters or per
591 one hundred grams or not more than twenty-five milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more
592 active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
593 (f) Not more than fifty milligrams of morphine per one hundred milliliters or per one
594 hundred grams, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic
595 amounts;
596 (5) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following
597 narcotic drugs or their salts: Buprenorphine;
598 (6) Anabolic steroids. Any drug or hormonal substance, chemically and
599 pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins, corticosteroids,
600 and dehydroepiandrosterone) that promotes muscle growth, except an anabolic steroid which
601 is expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species
602 and which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services for that

HCS HB 2828 18
603 administration. If any person prescribes, dispenses, or distributes such steroid for human use,
604 such person shall be considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an anabolic
605 steroid within the meaning of this subdivision. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed
606 in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity
607 of the following substances, including its salts, esters and ethers:
608 (a) 3ß,17ß-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
609 (b) 3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
610 (c) 5α-androstan-3,17-dione;
611 (d) 1-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-ene);
612 (e) 1-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-ene);
613 (f) 4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene);
614 (g) 5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
615 (h) 1-androstenedione ([5α]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);
616 (i) 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);
617 (j) 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);
618 (k) Bolasterone (7α, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
619 (l) Boldenone (17β-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);
620 (m) Boldione;
621 (n) Calusterone (7β, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
622 (o) Clostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
623 (p) Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17β-hydroxy-17α-methyl-androst-
624 1,4-dien-3-one);
625 (q) Desoxymethyltestosterone;
626 (r) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17ß-hydroxy-androstan-3-one);
627 (s) Drostanolone (17ß-hydroxy-2α-methyl-5α-androstan-3-one);
628 (t) Ethylestrenol (17α-ethyl-17ß-hydroxyestr-4-ene);
629 (u) Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17α-methyl-11ß,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
630 (v) Formebolone (2-formyl-17α-methyl-11α,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
631 (w) Furazabol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan);
632 (x) 13ß-ethyl-17ß-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
633 (y) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one);
634 (z) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one);
635 (aa) Mestanolone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androstan-3-one);
636 (bb) Mesterolone (1α- methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-androstan-3-one);
637 (cc) Methandienone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
638 (dd) Methandriol (17α-methyl-3ß,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene);
639 (ee) Methasterone (2α,17α-dimethyl-5α-androstan-17β-ol-3-one);

HCS HB 2828 19
640 (ff) Methenolone (1-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androst-1-en-3-one);
641 (gg) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
642 (hh) 17α-methyl-3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
643 (ii) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;
644 (jj) 17α-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17α-methyl-4-hydroxy-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-
645 3-one);
646 (kk) Methyldienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one);
647 (ll) Methyltrienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
648 (mm) Methyltestosterone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
649 (nn) Mibolerone (7α,17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
650 (oo) 17α-methyl-Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (17β-hydroxy-17α-methyl-5α-androst-1-en-
651 3-one) (a.k.a. '17-α-methyl-1-testosterone');
652 (pp) Nandrolone (17β-hydroxyestr-4-ene-3-one);
653 (qq) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
654 (rr) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);
655 (ss) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione);
656 (tt) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
657 (uu) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);
658 (vv) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);
659 (ww) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);
660 (xx) Norbolethone (13β,17α-diethyl-17β-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);
661 (yy) Norclostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
662 (zz) Norethandrolone (17α-ethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
663 (aaa) Normethandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
664 (bbb) Oxandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5α]-androstan-3-one);
665 (ccc) Oxymesterone (17α-methyl-4,17β-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
666 (ddd) metholone (17α-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17β-hydroxy-[5α]-androstan-3-
667 one);
668 (eee) Prostanozol (17β-hydroxy-5α-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole);
669 (fff) Stanolone (Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a. 1-testosterone)(17β-hydroxy-5α-
670 androst-1-en-3-one));
671 (ggg) Stanozolol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);
672 (hhh) Stenbolone (17ß-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5α]-androst-1-en-3-one);
673 (iii) Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid
674 lactone);
675 (jjj) Testosterone (17ß-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
676 (kkk) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13ß,17α-diethyl-17ß-hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

HCS HB 2828 20
677 (lll) Trenbolone (17ß-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
678 (mmm) Any salt, ester, or ether of a drug or substance described or listed in this
679 subdivision, except an anabolic steroid which is expressly intended for administration through
680 implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the Secretary
681 of Health and Human Services for that administration;
682 (7) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a
683 United States Food and Drug Administration approved drug product;
684 (8) The department of health and senior services may except by rule any compound,
685 mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in
686 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection from the application of all or any part of
687 sections 195.010 to 195.320 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more
688 active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous
689 system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or
690 concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or
691 depressant effect on the central nervous system.
692 7. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule
693 IV if it finds that:
694 (1) The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in Schedule III;
695 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
696 States; and
697 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological
698 dependence relative to the substances in Schedule III.
699 8. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule IV:
700 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following
701 narcotic drugs or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited
702 quantities as set forth below:
703 (a) Not more than one milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five
704 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
705 (b) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2-
706 propionoxybutane);
707 (c) 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical
708 and geometric isomers, and salts of these isomers (including tramadol);
709 (d) Any of the following limited quantities of narcotic drugs or their salts, which shall
710 include one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to
711 confer upon the compound, mixture or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than
712 those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:

HCS HB 2828 21
713 a. Not more than two hundred milligrams of codeine per one hundred milliliters or
714 per one hundred grams;
715 b. Not more than one hundred milligrams of dihydrocodeine per one hundred
716 milliliters or per one hundred grams;
717 c. Not more than one hundred milligrams of ethylmorphine per one hundred
718 milliliters or per one hundred grams;
719 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
720 following substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
721 existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
722 designation:
723 (a) Alfaxalone;
724 (b) Alprazolam;
725 (c) Barbital;
726 (d) Bromazepam;
727 (e) Camazepam;
728 (f) Carisoprodol;
729 (g) Chloral betaine;
730 (h) Chloral hydrate;
731 (i) Chlordiazepoxide;
732 (j) Clobazam;
733 (k) Clonazepam;
734 (l) Clorazepate;
735 (m) Clotiazepam;
736 (n) Cloxazolam;
737 (o) Delorazepam;
738 (p) Diazepam;
739 (q) Dichloralphenazone;
740 (r) Estazolam;
741 (s) Ethchlorvynol;
742 (t) Ethinamate;
743 (u) Ethyl loflazepate;
744 (v) Fludiazepam;
745 (w) Flunitrazepam;
746 (x) Flurazepam;
747 (y) Fospropofol;
748 (z) Halazepam;
749 (aa) Haloxazolam;

HCS HB 2828 22
750 (bb) Ketazolam;
751 (cc) Loprazolam;
752 (dd) Lorazepam;
753 (ee) Lormetazepam;
754 (ff) Mebutamate;
755 (gg) Medazepam;
756 (hh) Meprobamate;
757 (ii) Methohexital;
758 (jj) Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
759 (kk) Midazolam;
760 (ll) Nimetazepam;
761 (mm) Nitrazepam;
762 (nn) Nordiazepam;
763 (oo) Oxazepam;
764 (pp) Oxazolam;
765 (qq) Paraldehyde;
766 (rr) Petrichloral;
767 (ss) Phenobarbital;
768 (tt) Pinazepam;
769 (uu) Prazepam;
770 (vv) Quazepam;
771 (ww) Suvorexant;
772 (xx) Temazepam;
773 (yy) Tetrazepam;
774 (zz) Triazolam;
775 (aaa) Zaleplon;
776 (bbb) Zolpidem;
777 (ccc) Zopiclone;
778 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
779 the following substance including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the
780 existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible: fenfluramine;
781 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of
782 the following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the
783 existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible: Lorcaserin;
784 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
785 following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their
786 salts, isomers and salts of isomers:

HCS HB 2828 23
787 (a) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
788 (b) Diethylpropion;
789 (c) Fencamfamin;
790 (d) Fenproporex;
791 (e) Mazindol;
792 (f) Mefenorex;
793 (g) Modafinil;
794 (h) Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof;
795 (i) Phentermine;
796 (j) Pipradrol;
797 (k) Sibutramine;
798 (l) SPA ((-)-1-dimethyamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
799 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation containing any quantity of the
800 following substance, including its salts:
801 (a) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);
802 (b) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-
803 oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1 H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic
804 acid) (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
805 (c) Pentazocine;
806 (7) Ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of optical isomers, when the
807 substance is the only active medicinal ingredient;
808 (8) The department of health and senior services may except by rule any compound,
809 mixture, or preparation containing any depressant substance listed in subdivision (1) of this
810 subsection from the application of all or any part of sections 195.010 to 195.320 and sections
811 579.015 to 579.086 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active
812 medicinal ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
813 admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
814 vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on the central
815 nervous system.
816 9. The department of health and senior services shall place a substance in Schedule V
817 if it finds that:
818 (1) The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances
819 listed in Schedule IV;
820 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United
821 States; and
822 (3) The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence
823 liability relative to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV.

HCS HB 2828 24
824 10. The controlled substances listed in this subsection are included in Schedule V:
825 (1) Any compound, mixture or preparation containing any of the following narcotic
826 drugs or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as
827 set forth below, which also contains one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in
828 sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture or preparation valuable medicinal
829 qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
830 (a) Not more than two and five-tenths milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than
831 twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
832 (b) Not more than one hundred milligrams of opium per one hundred milliliters or per
833 one hundred grams;
834 (c) Not more than five-tenths milligram of difenoxin and not less than twenty-five
835 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
836 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of
837 the following substance having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system including its
838 salts, isomers and salts of isomers: pyrovalerone;
839 (3) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable quantity of
840 pseudoephedrine or its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or any compound,
841 mixture, or preparation containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine or its salts or optical
842 isomers, or salts of optical isomers;
843 (4) Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any
844 material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
845 substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts:
846 (a) Brivaracetam ((25)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]butanamide) (also
847 referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact);
848 (b) Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl
849 ester];
850 (c) Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide];
851 (d) Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid];
852 (5) Any drug product in finished dosage formulation that has been approved by the
853 U.S. Food and Drug Administration that contains cannabidiol (2-[1R-3-methyl-6R-(1-
854 methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-pentyl-1,3-benzenediol) derived from cannabis and no
855 more than 0.1 percent (w/w) residual tetrahydro cannabinols.
856 11. If any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified in subdivision (3) of
857 subsection 10 of this section is dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy without a
858 prescription:
859 (1) All packages of any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable
860 quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or

HCS HB 2828 25
861 ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers, shall be offered for sale only
862 from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not permitted, and only by a registered
863 pharmacist or registered pharmacy technician; and
864 (2) Any person purchasing, receiving or otherwise acquiring any compound, mixture,
865 or preparation containing any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts or optical
866 isomers, or salts of optical isomers or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical
867 isomers shall be at least eighteen years of age; and
868 (3) The pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician shall require
869 any person, prior to such person's purchasing, receiving or otherwise acquiring such
870 compound, mixture, or preparation to furnish suitable photo identification that is issued by a
871 state or the federal government or a document that, with respect to identification, is
872 considered acceptable and showing the date of birth of the person;
873 (4) The seller shall deliver the product directly into the custody of the purchaser.
874 12. Pharmacists, intern pharmacists, and registered pharmacy technicians shall
875 implement and maintain an electronic log of each transaction. Such log shall include the
876 following information:
877 (1) The name, address, and signature of the purchaser;
878 (2) The amount of the compound, mixture, or preparation purchased;
879 (3) The date and time of each purchase; and
880 (4) The name or initials of the pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered pharmacy
881 technician who dispensed the compound, mixture, or preparation to the purchaser.
882 13. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding sales of any compound,
883 mixture, or preparation as specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section in
884 accordance with transmission methods and frequency established by the department by
885 regulation;
886 14. No person shall dispense, sell, purchase, receive, or otherwise acquire quantities
887 greater than those specified in this chapter.
888 15. All persons who dispense or offer for sale pseudoephedrine and ephedrine
889 products in a pharmacy shall ensure that all such products are located only behind a pharmacy
890 counter where the public is not permitted.
891 16. The penalties for a knowing or reckless violation of the provisions of subsections
892 11 to 15 of this section are found in section 579.060.
893 17. The scheduling of substances specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
894 section and subsections 11, 12, 14, and 15 of this section shall not apply to any compounds,
895 mixtures, or preparations that are in liquid or liquid-filled gel capsule form or to any
896 compound, mixture, or preparation specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this

HCS HB 2828 26
897 section which must be dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy pursuant to a
898 prescription.
899 18. The manufacturer of a drug product or another interested party may apply with
900 the department of health and senior services for an exemption from this section. The
901 department of health and senior services may grant an exemption by rule from this section if
902 the department finds the drug product is not used in the illegal manufacture of
903 methamphetamine or other controlled or dangerous substances. The department of health
904 and senior services shall rely on reports from law enforcement and law enforcement
905 evidentiary laboratories in determining if the proposed product can be used to manufacture
906 illicit controlled substances.
907 19. The department of health and senior services shall revise and republish the
908 schedules annually.
909 20. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate rules under chapter
910 536 regarding the security and storage of Schedule V controlled substances, as described in
911 subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section, for distributors as registered by the
912 department of health and senior services.
913 21. Logs of transactions required to be kept and maintained by this section and
914 section 195.417 shall create a rebuttable presumption that the person whose name appears in
915 the logs is the person whose transactions are recorded in the logs.
579.015. 1. A person commits the offense of possession of a controlled substance if
2 he or she knowingly possesses a controlled substance, except as authorized by this chapter or
3 chapter 195.
4 2. The offense of possession of any controlled substance except thirty-five grams or
5 less of marijuana or any synthetic cannabinoid or a psychoactive substance is a class D
6 felony.
7 3. The offense of possession of a psychoactive substance for the first offense is a
8 class A misdemeanor. Any second or subsequent offense of possession of a psychoactive
9 substance is a class E felony.
10 4. The offense of possession of more than ten grams but thirty-five grams or less of
11 marijuana or any synthetic cannabinoid is a class A misdemeanor.
12 [4.] 5. The offense of possession of not more than ten grams of marijuana or any
13 synthetic cannabinoid is a class D misdemeanor. If the defendant has previously been found
14 guilty of any offense of the laws related to controlled substances of this state, or of the United
15 States, or any state, territory, or district, the offense is a class A misdemeanor. Prior findings
16 of guilt shall be [pleaded] pled and proven in the same manner as required by section
17 558.021.

HCS HB 2828 27
18 6. If a person under eighteen years of age violates the provisions of this section
19 by possessing a psychoactive substance, such person shall be guilty of an infraction.
20 [5.] 7. In any complaint, information, or indictment, and in any action or proceeding
21 brought for the enforcement of any provision of this chapter or chapter 195, it shall not be
22 necessary to include any exception, excuse, proviso, or exemption contained in this chapter or
23 chapter 195, and the burden of proof of any such exception, excuse, proviso or exemption
24 shall be upon the defendant.
25 8. As used in this section, "psychoactive substance" means the substances listed
26 in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subdivision (6) of subsection 2 of section 195.017.
579.020. 1. A person commits the offense of delivery of a controlled substance if,
2 except as authorized in this chapter or chapter 195, he or she:
3 (1) Knowingly distributes or delivers a controlled substance;
4 (2) Attempts to distribute or deliver a controlled substance;
5 (3) Knowingly possesses a controlled substance with the intent to distribute or deliver
6 any amount of a controlled substance; or
7 (4) Knowingly permits a minor to purchase or transport illegally obtained controlled
8 substances.
9 2. Except when the controlled substance is thirty-five grams or less of marijuana or
10 synthetic cannabinoid or a psychoactive substance or as otherwise provided under
11 subsection 5 of this section, the offense of delivery of a controlled substance is a class C
12 felony.
13 3. Except as otherwise provided under subsection 4 or 6of this section, the offense of
14 delivery of thirty-five grams or less of marijuana or synthetic cannabinoid or a psychoactive
15 substance is a class E felony.
16 4. The offense of delivery of thirty-five grams or less of marijuana or synthetic
17 cannabinoid to a person less than seventeen years of age who is at least two years younger
18 than the defendant is a class C felony.
19 5. The offense of delivery of a controlled substance is a class B felony if:
20 (1) The delivery or distribution is any amount of a controlled substance except thirty-
21 five grams or less of marijuana or synthetic cannabinoid, to a person less than seventeen years
22 of age who is at least two years younger than the defendant; or
23 (2) The person knowingly permits a minor to purchase or transport illegally obtained
24 controlled substances.
25 6. The offense of delivery of a psychoactive substance to a person under eighteen
26 years of age is a class D felony.

HCS HB 2828 28
27 7. As used in this section, "psychoactive substance" means the substances listed
28 in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subdivision (6) of subsection 2 of section 195.017.
✔